District of Columbia statutes.
29-406.52

Mandatory indemnification.

A nonprofit corporation shall indemnify a director or officer to the extent the director or officer was successful, on the merits or otherwise, in the defense of any proceeding to which the director or officer was a party because the director or officer was a director or officer of the corporation against reasonable expenses incurred by the director or officer in connection with the proceeding.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

This section is referenced in § 29-406.53, § 29-406.54, and § 29-406.56.

Section References